extensions/1013418_russian-english-dictionary/russian_english_dictionary-1.1/dictionaries/Russian-English_Bilingual.aff
SFX 236 Y 77
SFX 236 овать овать .
SFX 236 овать ую .
SFX 236 овать уем .
SFX 236 овать уешь .
SFX 236 овать уете .
SFX 236 овать ует .
SFX 236 овать уют .
SFX 236 овать овал .
SFX 236 овать овала .
SFX 236 овать овало .
SFX 236 овать овали .
SFX 236 овать ую .
SFX 236 овать уем .
SFX 236 овать уешь .
SFX 236 овать уете .
SFX 236 овать ует .
SFX 236 овать уют .
SFX 236 овать уя .
SFX 236 овать овав .
SFX 236 овать овавши .
SFX 236 овать уй .
SFX 236 овать уйте .
SFX 236 овать ующий .
SFX 236 овать ующего .
SFX 236 овать ующему .
SFX 236 овать ующего .
SFX 236 овать ующий .
SFX 236 овать ующим .
SFX 236 овать ующем .
SFX 236 овать ующая .
SFX 236 овать ующей .
SFX 236 овать ующей .
SFX 236 овать ующую .
SFX 236 овать ующей .
SFX 236 овать ующею .
SFX 236 овать ующей .
SFX 236 овать ующее .
SFX 236 овать ующего .
SFX 236 овать ующему .
SFX 236 овать ующее .
SFX 236 овать ующим .
SFX 236 овать ующем .
SFX 236 овать ующие .
SFX 236 овать ующих .
SFX 236 овать ующим .
SFX 236 овать ующих .
SFX 236 овать ующие .
SFX 236 овать ующими .
SFX 236 овать ующих .
SFX 236 овать овавший .
SFX 236 овать овавшего .
SFX 236 овать овавшему .
SFX 236 овать овавшего .
SFX 236 овать овавший .
SFX 236 овать овавшим .
SFX 236 овать овавшем .
SFX 236 овать овавшая .
SFX 236 овать овавшей .
SFX 236 овать овавшей .
SFX 236 овать овавшую .
SFX 236 овать овавшей .
SFX 236 овать овавшею .
SFX 236 овать овавшей .
SFX 236 овать овавшее .
SFX 236 овать овавшего .
SFX 236 овать овавшему .
SFX 236 овать овавшее .
SFX 236 овать овавшим .
SFX 236 овать овавшем .
SFX 236 овать овавшие .
SFX 236 овать овавших .
SFX 236 овать овавшим .
SFX 236 овать овавших .
SFX 236 овать овавшие .
SFX 236 овать овавшими .
SFX 236 овать овавших .
SFX 236 овать овавшихся .

SFX 237 Y 77
SFX 237 овать овать .
SFX 237 овать ую .
SFX 237 овать уем .
SFX 237 овать уешь .
SFX 237 овать уете .
SFX 237 овать ует .
SFX 237 овать уют .
SFX 237 овать овал .
SFX 237 овать овала .
SFX 237 овать овало .
SFX 237 овать овали .
SFX 237 овать ую .
SFX 237 овать уем .
SFX 237 овать уешь .
SFX 237 овать уете .
SFX 237 овать ует .
SFX 237 овать уют .
SFX 237 овать уя .
SFX 237 овать овав .
SFX 237 овать овавши .
SFX 237 овать уй .
SFX 237 овать уйте .
SFX 237 овать ующий .
SFX 237 овать ующего .
SFX 237 овать ующему .
SFX 237 овать ующего .
SFX 237 овать ующий .
SFX 237 овать ующим .
SFX 237 овать ующем .
SFX 237 овать ующая .
SFX 237 овать ующей .
SFX 237 овать ующей .
SFX 237 овать ующую .
SFX 237 овать ующей .
SFX 237 овать ующею .
SFX 237 овать ующей .
SFX 237 овать ующее .
SFX 237 овать ующего .
SFX 237 овать ующему .
SFX 237 овать ующее .
SFX 237 овать ующим .
SFX 237 овать ующем .
SFX 237 овать ующие .
SFX 237 овать ующих .
SFX 237 овать ующим .
SFX 237 овать ующих .
SFX 237 овать ующие .
SFX 237 овать ующими .
SFX 237 овать ующих .
SFX 237 овать овавший .
SFX 237 овать овавшего .
SFX 237 овать овавшему .
SFX 237 овать овавшего .
SFX 237 овать овавший .
SFX 237 овать овавшим .
SFX 237 овать овавшем .
SFX 237 овать овавшая .
SFX 237 овать овавшей .
SFX 237 овать овавшей .
SFX 237 овать овавшую .
SFX 237 овать овавшей .
SFX 237 овать овавшею .
SFX 237 овать овавшей .
SFX 237 овать овавшее .
SFX 237 овать овавшего .
SFX 237 овать овавшему .
SFX 237 овать овавшее .
SFX 237 овать овавшим .
SFX 237 овать овавшем .
SFX 237 овать овавшие .
SFX 237 овать овавших .
SFX 237 овать овавшим .
SFX 237 овать овавших .
SFX 237 овать овавшие .
SFX 237 овать овавшими .
SFX 237 овать овавших .
SFX 237 овать овавшихся .

SFX 238 Y 40
SFX 238 b ptional b
SFX 238 d sional d
SFX 238 be ptional be
SFX 238 e tional ce
SFX 238 ke cational ke
SFX 238 de sional de
SFX 238 e ional [^o]se
SFX 238 e itional ose
SFX 238 e ional te
SFX 238 e ational [^bcdkst]e
SFX 238 el ulsional el
SFX 238 0 lational [aiou]l
SFX 238 0 ational [^aeiou]l
SFX 238 er rational er
SFX 238 0 ational [^e]r
SFX 238 0 ional [sx]
SFX 238 0 ional [^n]t
SFX 238 0 ational nt
SFX 238 y icational y
SFX 238 0 ational [^bdelrstxy]
SFX 238 b ptionally b
SFX 238 d sionally d
SFX 238 be ptionally be
SFX 238 e tionally ce
SFX 238 ke cationally ke
SFX 238 de sionally de
SFX 238 e ionally [^o]se
SFX 238 e itionally ose
SFX 238 e ionally te
SFX 238 e ationally [^bcdkst]e
SFX 238 el ulsionally el
SFX 238 0 lationally [aiou]l
SFX 238 0 ationally [^aeiou]l
SFX 238 er rationally er
SFX 238 0 ationally [^e]r
SFX 238 0 ionally [sx]
SFX 238 0 ionally [^n]t
SFX 238 0 ationally nt
SFX 238 y icationally y
SFX 238 0 ationally [^bdelrstxy]

SFX 239 Y 15
SFX 239 e ory te
SFX 239 e atory [mr]e
SFX 239 e ary se
SFX 239 0 ry [^mrst]e
SFX 239 0 ory [^aeous]t
SFX 239 0 ry [aeous]t
SFX 239 0 ery h
SFX 239 0 atory [^i]m
SFX 239 im matory im
SFX 239 0 ory s
SFX 239 0 ary ion
SFX 239 0 ry [^i]on
SFX 239 0 nery [aiu]n
SFX 239 0 ry [^aiou]n
SFX 239 0 ry [^ehmstn]

SFX 240 Y 24
SFX 240 e ily [^aeiouy]e
SFX 240 0 ily [aeiouy]e
SFX 240 0 ily [aiou]y
SFX 240 ey ily ey
SFX 240 y ily [^aeiou]y
SFX 240 0 bily [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX 240 0 kily [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 240 0 dily [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX 240 0 fily [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX 240 0 gily [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX 240 0 kily [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX 240 0 lily [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 240 0 mily [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX 240 0 nily [^aeio][aiou]n
SFX 240 0 pily [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX 240 0 rily [^aeio][aiou]r
SFX 240 0 sily [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX 240 0 tily [^aeio][aiou]t
SFX 240 0 vily [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX 240 0 zily [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX 240 0 ily [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX 240 0 ily [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX 240 0 ily [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX 240 0 ily [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]

SFX 241 Y 14
SFX 241 а а .
SFX 241 а ы .
SFX 241 а е .
SFX 241 а у .
SFX 241 а ой .
SFX 241 а ою .
SFX 241 а е .
SFX 241 а ы .
SFX 241 а 0 .
SFX 241 а ам .
SFX 241 а  .
SFX 241 а ами .
SFX 241 а ах .
SFX 241 а ем .

SFX 242 Y 14
SFX 242 а а .
SFX 242 а ы .
SFX 242 а е .
SFX 242 а у .
SFX 242 а ой .
SFX 242 а ою .
SFX 242 а е .
SFX 242 а ы .
SFX 242 а 0 .
SFX 242 а ам .
SFX 242 а  .
SFX 242 а ами .
SFX 242 а ах .
SFX 242 а ем .

SFX 243 Y 29
SFX 243 ий ий .
SFX 243 ий ого .
SFX 243 ий ому .
SFX 243 ий ого .
SFX 243 ий ий .
SFX 243 ий им .
SFX 243 ий ом .
SFX 243 ий ая .
SFX 243 ий ой .
SFX 243 ий ой .
SFX 243 ий ую .
SFX 243 ий ой .
SFX 243 ий ою .
SFX 243 ий ой .
SFX 243 ий ое .
SFX 243 ий ого .
SFX 243 ий ому .
SFX 243 ий ое .
SFX 243 ий им .
SFX 243 ий ом .
SFX 243 ий ие .
SFX 243 ий их .
SFX 243 ий им .
SFX 243 ий их .
SFX 243 ий ие .
SFX 243 ий ими .
SFX 243 ий их .
SFX 243 ий и .
SFX 243 ий на .

SFX 244 Y 29
SFX 244 ий ий .
SFX 244 ий ого .
SFX 244 ий ому .
SFX 244 ий ого .
SFX 244 ий ий .
SFX 244 ий им .
SFX 244 ий ом .
SFX 244 ий ая .
SFX 244 ий ой .
SFX 244 ий ой .
SFX 244 ий ую .
SFX 244 ий ой .
SFX 244 ий ою .
SFX 244 ий ой .
SFX 244 ий ое .
SFX 244 ий ого .
SFX 244 ий ому .
SFX 244 ий ое .
SFX 244 ий им .
SFX 244 ий ом .
SFX 244 ий ие .
SFX 244 ий их .
SFX 244 ий им .
SFX 244 ий их .
SFX 244 ий ие .
SFX 244 ий ими .
SFX 244 ий их .
SFX 244 ий и .
SFX 244 ий на .

SFX 245 Y 13
SFX 245 0  .
SFX 245 0 а .
SFX 245 0 у .
SFX 245 0  .
SFX 245 0 ом .
SFX 245 0 е .
SFX 245 0 и .
SFX 245 0 ов .
SFX 245 0 ам .
SFX 245 0 и .
SFX 245 0 ами .
SFX 245 0 ах .
SFX 245 0 ах .

SFX 246 Y 13
SFX 246 0  .
SFX 246 0 а .
SFX 246 0 у .
SFX 246 0  .
SFX 246 0 ом .
SFX 246 0 е .
SFX 246 0 и .
SFX 246 0 ов .
SFX 246 0 ам .
SFX 246 0 и .
SFX 246 0 ами .
SFX 246 0 ах .
SFX 246 0 ах .

SFX 247 Y 2
SFX 247 0  .
SFX 247 0 а .

SFX 248 Y 2
SFX 248 0  .
SFX 248 0 а .

SFX 249 Y 2
SFX 249 0  .
SFX 249 0 а .

SFX 250 Y 2
SFX 250 0  .
SFX 250 0 а .

SFX 251 Y 9
SFX 251 e ically e
SFX 251 er rically er
SFX 251 0 ically [^e]r
SFX 251 0 atically [aeiou]m
SFX 251 0 ically [^aeiou]m
SFX 251 0 tically ma
SFX 251 a ically [^m]a
SFX 251 y ically y
SFX 251 0 ically [^aemry]

SFX 252 Y 2
SFX 252 0  .
SFX 252 0 а .

SFX 253 Y 2
SFX 253 0  .
SFX 253 0 а .

SFX 254 Y 32
SFX 254 ный ный .
SFX 254 ный ного .
SFX 254 ный ному .
SFX 254 ный ного .
SFX 254 ный ный .
SFX 254 ный ным .
SFX 254 ный ном .
SFX 254 ный ная .
SFX 254 ный ной .
SFX 254 ный ной .
SFX 254 ный ную .
SFX 254 ный ной .
SFX 254 ный ною .
SFX 254 ный ной .
SFX 254 ный ное .
SFX 254 ный ного .
SFX 254 ный ному .
SFX 254 ный ное .
SFX 254 ный ным .
SFX 254 ный ном .
SFX 254 ный ные .
SFX 254 ный ных .
SFX 254 ный ным .
SFX 254 ный ных .
SFX 254 ный ные .
SFX 254 ный ными .
SFX 254 ный ных .
SFX 254 ный ен .
SFX 254 ный на .
SFX 254 ный но .
SFX 254 ный ны .
SFX 254 ный 0 .

SFX 255 Y 2
SFX 255 0  .
SFX 255 0 а .

SFX 256 Y 2
SFX 256 0  .
SFX 256 0 а .

SFX 257 Y 32
SFX 257 ный ный .
SFX 257 ный ного .
SFX 257 ный ному .
SFX 257 ный ного .
SFX 257 ный ный .
SFX 257 ный ным .
SFX 257 ный ном .
SFX 257 ный ная .
SFX 257 ный ной .
SFX 257 ный ной .
SFX 257 ный ную .
SFX 257 ный ной .
SFX 257 ный ною .
SFX 257 ный ной .
SFX 257 ный ное .
SFX 257 ный ного .
SFX 257 ный ному .
SFX 257 ный ное .
SFX 257 ный ным .
SFX 257 ный ном .
SFX 257 ный ные .
SFX 257 ный ных .
SFX 257 ный ным .
SFX 257 ный ных .
SFX 257 ный ные .
SFX 257 ный ными .
SFX 257 ный ных .
SFX 257 ный ен .
SFX 257 ный на .
SFX 257 ный но .
SFX 257 ный ны .
SFX 257 ный 0 .

SFX 258 Y 2
SFX 258 0  .
SFX 258 0 а .

SFX 259 Y 2
SFX 259 0  .
SFX 259 0 а .

SFX 260 Y 21
SFX 260 e iness [^aeiouy]e
SFX 260 0 iness [aeiouy]e
SFX 260 0 biness [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX 260 0 kiness [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 260 0 diness [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX 260 0 finess [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX 260 0 giness [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX 260 0 kiness [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX 260 0 liness [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 260 0 miness [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX 260 0 niness [^aeio][aiou]n
SFX 260 0 piness [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX 260 0 riness [^aeio][aiou]r
SFX 260 0 siness [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX 260 0 tiness [^aeio][aiou]t
SFX 260 0 viness [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX 260 0 ziness [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX 260 0 iness [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX 260 0 iness [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 260 0 iness [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 260 0 iness [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz]

SFX 261 Y 2
SFX 261 0  .
SFX 261 0 а .

SFX 262 Y 2
SFX 262 0  .
SFX 262 0 а .

SFX 263 Y 29
SFX 263 ий ий .
SFX 263 ий ого .
SFX 263 ий ому .
SFX 263 ий ого .
SFX 263 ий ий .
SFX 263 ий им .
SFX 263 ий ом .
SFX 263 ий ая .
SFX 263 ий ой .
SFX 263 ий ой .
SFX 263 ий ую .
SFX 263 ий ой .
SFX 263 ий ою .
SFX 263 ий ой .
SFX 263 ий ое .
SFX 263 ий ого .
SFX 263 ий ому .
SFX 263 ий ое .
SFX 263 ий им .
SFX 263 ий ом .
SFX 263 ий ие .
SFX 263 ий их .
SFX 263 ий им .
SFX 263 ий их .
SFX 263 ий ие .
SFX 263 ий ими .
SFX 263 ий их .
SFX 263 ий и .
SFX 263 ий на .

SFX 264 Y 14
SFX 264 0  .
SFX 264 0 а .
SFX 264 0 у .
SFX 264 0 а .
SFX 264 0 ом .
SFX 264 0 е .
SFX 264 0 ы .
SFX 264 0 ов .
SFX 264 0 ам .
SFX 264 0 ов .
SFX 264 0 ами .
SFX 264 0 ах .
SFX 264 0  .
SFX 264 0 ем .

SFX 265 Y 14
SFX 265 0  .
SFX 265 0 а .
SFX 265 0 у .
SFX 265 0 а .
SFX 265 0 ом .
SFX 265 0 е .
SFX 265 0 ы .
SFX 265 0 ов .
SFX 265 0 ам .
SFX 265 0 ов .
SFX 265 0 ами .
SFX 265 0 ах .
SFX 265 0  .
SFX 265 0 ем .

SFX 266 Y 29
SFX 266 ий ий .
SFX 266 ий ого .
SFX 266 ий ому .
SFX 266 ий ого .
SFX 266 ий ий .
SFX 266 ий им .
SFX 266 ий ом .
SFX 266 ий ая .
SFX 266 ий ой .
SFX 266 ий ой .
SFX 266 ий ую .
SFX 266 ий ой .
SFX 266 ий ою .
SFX 266 ий ой .
SFX 266 ий ое .
SFX 266 ий ого .
SFX 266 ий ому .
SFX 266 ий ое .
SFX 266 ий им .
SFX 266 ий ом .
SFX 266 ий ие .
SFX 266 ий их .
SFX 266 ий им .
SFX 266 ий их .
SFX 266 ий ие .
SFX 266 ий ими .
SFX 266 ий их .
SFX 266 ий и .
SFX 266 ий на .

SFX 267 Y 8
SFX 267 а а .
SFX 267 а ы .
SFX 267 а е .
SFX 267 а у .
SFX 267 а ой .
SFX 267 а ою .
SFX 267 а е .
SFX 267 а ов .

SFX 268 Y 8
SFX 268 а а .
SFX 268 а ы .
SFX 268 а е .
SFX 268 а у .
SFX 268 а ой .
SFX 268 а ою .
SFX 268 а е .
SFX 268 а ов .
